Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 1

General Provisions

13-20-101. Short title.

This chapter may be referred to as the “Housing Authorities Law.”

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-801.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Aid, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law — 1955 Tennessee Survey (Clyde L. Ball), 8 Vand. L. Rev. 1061.

Tort Law–Negligence–Landlords' Duty Of Care To Tenants in Tennessee (Yusuf Malik), 77 Tenn. L. Rev. 471 (2010).

Attorney General Opinions. Housing authority as municipal agency exempt from contractor licensing requirement, OAG 99-013, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 1 (1/25/99).

Applicability of statutes pertaining to public purchasing and public contracting, and governing general contractors, to housing authorities established by municipalities or counties pursuant to T.C.A. §§ 13-20-101 et seq., OAG 05-170, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 172 (11/21/05).

13-20-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Authority” or “housing authority” means a public body and a body corporate and politic organized in accordance with this chapter for the purposes, with the powers, and subject to the restrictions, hereinafter set forth;

“Bonds” means any bonds, interim certificates, notes, debentures, or other obligations of the authority issued pursuant to this chapter;

“Business” means any lawful activity conducted primarily:

For the purchase, sale, lease and rental of personal and real property, and for the manufacturing, processing, or marketing of products, commodities, or any other personal property;

For the sale of services to the public; or

By a nonprofit organization;

“City” means the city or town which is, or is about to be, included in the territorial boundaries of an authority when created hereunder;

“City clerk” and “mayor” means the clerk and mayor, respectively, of the city, or the officers thereof, charged with the duties customarily imposed on the clerk and mayor, respectively;

“Commissioner” means one (1) of the members of an authority appointed in accordance with this chapter;

“Community facilities” includes real and personal property, and buildings and equipment for recreation or social assemblies, for educational, health or welfare purposes and necessary utilities when designed primarily for the benefit and use of the housing authority and/or the occupants of the dwelling accommodations;

“Contract” means any agreement of an authority with or for the benefit of an obligee whether contained in a resolution, trust indenture, mortgage, lease, bond or other instrument;

“Council” means the legislative body, council, board of commissioners, board of trustees, or other body charged with governing the city;

“Dwelling unit” means a building or structure used as a place of residence;

“Farmers of low income” means persons or families who at the time of their admission to occupancy in a dwelling of the authority:

Live under unsafe or unsanitary housing conditions;

Derive their principal income from operating or working upon a farm; and

Had an aggregate average annual net income for the three (3) years preceding their admission that was less than the amount determined by the authority to be necessary, within its area of operations, to enable them, without financial assistance, to obtain decent, safe, and sanitary housing, without overcrowding;

“Federal government” includes the United States, or any agency, instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States;

“Governing body” means the council of any city;

“Government” includes the state and federal governments and any subdivision, agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of either of them;

“Housing project” includes all real and personal property, buildings and improvements, stores, offices, lands for farming and gardening, and community facilities acquired or constructed or to be acquired or constructed pursuant to a single plan or undertaking, to:

Demolish, clear, remove, alter or repair unsanitary or unsafe housing; and/or

Provide safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations for persons of low income;

“Housing project” may also be applied to the planning of the buildings and improvements, the acquisition of property, the demolition of existing structures, the construction, reconstruction, alteration and repair of the improvements, and all other work in connection therewith. “Housing project” may also include such buildings and equipment for recreational or social assemblies for educational, health or welfare purposes, and such necessary utilities, as are designed primarily for the benefit and use of the housing authority and/or the occupants of such dwelling accommodations;

“Mixed-finance project” means a project that is financially assisted by private resources, which may include low-income housing tax credits, in addition to an amount provided under any state or federal program. “Mixed-finance project” includes a project that is developed by:

An authority or by an entity affiliated with an authority;

A partnership, a limited liability company, or other entity in which the authority, or an entity affiliated with an authority, is a general partner, managing member, or otherwise participates in the activities of the entity; or

Any entity that grants to the authority the right of first refusal and first option to purchase, after the close of the compliance period, the qualified low-income building in which the public housing units exist in accordance with the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, § 42(i)(7) (26 U.S.C. § 42(i)(7));

“Mortgage” includes deeds of trust, mortgages, building and loan contracts or other instruments conveying real or personal property as security for bonds and conferring a right to foreclose and cause a sale thereof;

“Municipality” means any city, town, or village or other municipality in the state;

“Obligee of the authority” or “obligee” includes any bondholder, trustee or trustees for any bondholders, any lessor demising property to the authority used in connection with a housing project or any assignee or assignees of the lessor's interest or any part thereof, and the United States, when it is a party to any contract with the authority;

“Persons of low income” means persons or families who lack the amount of income which is necessary, as determined by the authority undertaking the housing project, to enable them, without financial assistance, to live in decent, safe, and sanitary dwellings, without overcrowding;

“Real property” includes lands, lands under water, structures, and any and all easements, franchises and incorporeal hereditaments and every estate and right therein, legal and equitable, including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage or otherwise;

“Representative district” means any division or district of any city or municipality which is created for the purpose of electing a representative to the governing body of the city or municipality;

“State” means the state of Tennessee;

“Taxing agency” means any county, city, town or metropolitan government in the state; and

“Trust indenture” includes instruments pledging the revenues of real or personal properties but not conveying such properties or conferring a right to foreclose and cause a sale thereof.

Acts 1935 (Ex.Sess.), ch. 20, § 3; 1935 (Ex.Sess.), ch. 44, § 2; 1935 (Ex.Sess.), ch. 45, § 2; 1937, ch. 234, § 1; 1943, ch. 22, §§ 2-4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.2 (Williams, §§ 3647.3, 3647.31, 3647.38); Acts 1965, ch. 193, § 1; 1972, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 854, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-802; Acts 1999, ch. 243, § 2.

Cross-References. Farmers of low income, §§ 13-20-501, 13-20-508, 13-20-509, 13-20-510.

Law Reviews.

Tort Law–Negligence–Landlords' Duty Of Care To Tenants in Tennessee (Yusuf Malik), 77 Tenn. L. Rev. 471 (2010).

13-20-103. Meetings and residence of commissioners.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to prevent meetings of the commissioners anywhere within the perimeter boundaries of the area of operation of the authority or within any additional area where the housing authority is authorized to undertake a housing project, nor to prevent the appointment of any person as a commissioner of the authority who resides within such boundaries or such additional area, and who is otherwise eligible for such appointment under this chapter.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 44, as added by Acts 1943, ch. 22, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29H (Williams, § 3647.29t); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-803.

Law Reviews.

Tort Law–Negligence–Landlords' Duty Of Care To Tenants in Tennessee (Yusuf Malik), 77 Tenn. L. Rev. 471 (2010).

Attorney General Opinions. Residency requirements for city housing authority commissioners, OAG 99-075, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 75 (4/5/99).

Residency requirement for commissioners of city housing authority, OAG 04-092, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 101 (5/13/04).

13-20-104. Powers of housing authority.

An authority has the power to:

Investigate into living, dwelling and housing conditions and into the means and methods of improving such conditions;

Determine where unsafe, or unsanitary dwelling or housing conditions exist;

Study and make recommendations, in cooperation with any city, municipal or regional planning commission, concerning the plan of any city or municipality located within its boundaries in relation to the problem of clearing, replanning and reconstruction of areas in which unsafe, or unsanitary dwelling or housing conditions exist, and concerning provisions for dwelling accommodations for persons of low income;

Prepare, carry out and operate housing projects;

Provide for the construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement, alteration or repair of any housing project or any part thereof by direct sponsorship of the authority, by the purchase of a mortgage or by the making of a mortgage loan to a not-for-profit entity or corporation. In the event it becomes necessary for an authority to issue bonds for the obtaining of capital to purchase a mortgage or the making of a mortgage loan as provided for in this section, the bond issue shall first be approved by ordinance or resolution of the local governing body;

Own, operate, assist, or otherwise participate in one (1) or more mixed-finance projects to provide for the construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement, alteration or repair of any housing project or any part thereof. An authority may provide capital assistance, operating assistance and financing assistance to a mixed-finance project in the form of a grant, loan, guaranty, collateralization or other form of investment in the project, or other form of public or private borrowings, for the construction or rehabilitation of a housing project;

Take over by purchase, lease or otherwise any housing project located within its boundaries undertaken by any government, or by any city or municipality located in whole or in part within its boundaries;

Manage as agent of any city or municipality located in whole or in part within its boundaries any housing project constructed or owned by such city;

Act as agent for the federal government in connection with the acquisition, construction, operation and/or management of a housing project or any part thereof;

Arrange with any city or municipality located in whole or in part within its boundaries or with a government for the furnishing, replanning, installing, opening or closing of streets, roads, roadways, alleys, sidewalks or other places or facilities;

Arrange for the acquisition by such city, municipality, or government of property, option or property rights;

Arrange for the furnishing of property or services in connection with a project;

Arrange with the state, its subdivisions and agencies, and any county, city or municipality of the state, to the extent that it is within the scope of each of their respective functions:

Cause the services customarily provided by each of them to be rendered for the benefit of such housing authority and/or the occupants of any housing projects;

Provide and maintain parks and sewerage, water and other facilities adjacent to or in connection with housing projects; and

Change the city or municipality map, to plan, replan, zone or rezone any part of the city or municipality;

Lease or rent any of the dwellings or other accommodations or any of the lands, buildings, structures or facilities embraced in any housing project and to establish and revise the rents or charges therefor;

Enter upon any building or property in order to conduct investigations or to make surveys or soundings;

Purchase, lease, obtain options upon, acquire by gift, grant, bequest, devise, or otherwise, any property, real or personal or any interest therein from any person, firm, corporation, city, municipality, or government;

Acquire by eminent domain any real property, including improvements and fixtures thereon except as provided in § 13-20-105;

Sell, exchange, transfer, assign, or pledge any property, real or personal or any interest therein to any person, firm, corporation, municipality, city, or government;

Own, hold, clear and improve property;

Insure or provide for the insurance of the property or operations of the authority against such risks as the authority may deem advisable;

Procure insurance or guarantees from the federal government of the payment of any debts or parts thereof secured by mortgages made or held by the authority on any property included in any housing project;

Borrow money upon its bonds, notes, debentures, or other evidences of indebtedness and secure the same by pledges of its revenues, and, subject to the limitations hereinafter imposed, by mortgages upon property held or to be held by it, or in any other manner;

In connection with any loan, agree to limitations upon its right to dispose of any housing project or part thereof or undertake additional housing projects;

In connection with any loan by a government, agree to limitations upon the exercise of any powers conferred upon the authority by this chapter;

Invest any funds held in reserve or sinking funds, or any funds not required for immediate disbursement, in property or securities in which savings banks may legally invest funds subject to their control;

Sue and be sued;

Have a seal and alter the same at pleasure;

Have a perpetual succession;

Make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers of the authority;

Make and from time to time amend and repeal bylaws, rules and regulations not inconsistent with this chapter;

Conduct examinations and investigations and hear testimony and take proof under oath at public or private hearings on any matter material for its information;

Issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses for the production of books and papers and to issue commissions for the examination of witnesses who are out of the state or unable to attend before the authority, or are excused from attendance;

Make available to such agencies, boards or commissions as are charged with the duty of abating or requiring the correction of nuisance or like conditions, or of demolishing unsafe or unsanitary structures within its territorial limits, its findings and recommendations with regard to any building or property where conditions exist which are dangerous to the public health, morals, safety or welfare;

Provide consulting services to housing authorities outside the housing authority’s territorial jurisdiction;

Enter into management contracts with other authorities outside the authority's territorial jurisdiction, which provide for the management of all or any part of the operations of an authority or all or any part of a housing project or a mixed-finance project of an authority; and

Enter into agreements with municipalities under which the authority agrees to exercise any or all powers of an authority under this chapter relating to redevelopment or urban renewal projects for such municipality with respect to one (1) or more redevelopment or urban renewal projects, including, but not limited to, holding public hearings, preparing redevelopment and urban renewal plans and managing redevelopment projects; provided, however, that all debt related to such redevelopment projects must be issued by the housing authority for the jurisdiction subject to the agreement and the housing authority for the jurisdiction subject to the agreement must consent to such agreement by resolution. Any municipality may enter into an agreement described in this subsection (a).

Any of the investigations or examinations provided for in this chapter may be conducted by the authority or by a committee appointed by it, consisting of one (1) or more commissioners, or by counsel, or by an officer or employee specially authorized by the authority to conduct it. Any commissioner, counsel for the authority, or any persons designated by it to conduct an investigation or examination shall have power to administer oaths, take affidavits and issue subpoenas or commissions. An authority may exercise any or all of the powers herein conferred upon it, either generally or with respect to a specific housing project or projects through or by an agent or agents which it may designate, including any corporations which are or shall be formed under the laws of this state, and for such purposes, an authority may cause one (1) or more corporations to be formed under the laws of this state or may acquire the capital stock of any corporation or corporations. All housing project property owned by a corporate agent of a housing authority is subject to the control of and is deemed to be property of the housing authority. Any corporate agent may, to the extent permitted by law, exercise any of the powers herein conferred upon the authority. For purposes of this subsection (b), “corporation” shall include both for-profit corporations and nonprofit corporations.

In addition to all of the other powers herein conferred upon it, an authority may do all things necessary and convenient to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter. No provisions with respect to the acquisition, operation or disposition of property by other public bodies shall be applicable to an authority unless the general assembly shall specifically so state.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this chapter or in any other provision of law, an authority may include, in any contract let in connection with a project, stipulations requiring that the contractor and any subcontractor comply with requirements as to minimum wages and maximum hours of labor, and comply with any conditions which the federal government may have attached to its financial aid of the project.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this chapter or in any other provision of law, an authority shall not initiate any public housing project under this chapter or any other provision of law until the governing body, or agency designated by it or empowered by law to act, of each city or municipality, in which any of the area to be covered by the project is situated in a representative district thereof, has approved the proposed public housing project plan, which provides an outline for the development, construction, lease, or purchase of the proposed housing project and is sufficiently complete to indicate its relationship to definite local objectives of appropriate land use and providing decent, safe, and sanitary housing for persons of low income.

Such cities or municipalities are hereby authorized to approve public housing project plans through their governing body or agency designated by it for that purpose.(B) The governing body shall not approve a public housing project plan until after a public hearing has been held by the governing body, or the agency designated by it or empowered by law so to act, to determine the necessity for the adoption of the public housing project proposal. Notice of the public hearing shall be given, by publishing once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks immediately preceding the public hearing in a newspaper of general circulation published in the city or municipality, providing notice of the time, place, and purpose of the public hearing and identifying at least two (2) locations, one (1) of which shall be the offices of the authority, where a map of the area to be included in the proposed public housing project, with the streets or other lines marking the boundaries of the area clearly indicated, may be reviewed by interested persons; and

The failure to give the notice required in subdivision (e)(2)(B) may be asserted only by an owner having interest in property or an occupant of a business or dwelling unit thirty (30) days prior to the date of public hearing within the representative district in which a public housing project, as authorized pursuant to this chapter, both under the public or private acts, is proposed to be developed, constructed, leased, or purchased as a cause of action on the trial of the issue of the right of the housing authority to develop, construct, lease, or purchase the public housing project, and such failure to give notice as required in subdivision (e)(2)(B) constitutes a cause of action unless, in the judgment of the court trying such issue, there has been compliance with subdivision (e)(2)(B).

For purposes of this subsection (e), “public housing project” shall mean housing units that are subject to a housing authority's annual contribution contract with the United States department of housing and urban development.

“Low-income housing tax credit (LIHTC) property” means low-income housing property restricted under government regulations pursuant to § 42 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 42), the low-income housing tax credit program.

Upon the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of its governing body, the city or county for which a housing authority is created may delegate to such housing authority the authority to negotiate and accept payments in lieu of ad valorem taxes from the housing authority's lessees operating LIHTC property; provided, however, that such authorization shall be granted only upon a finding that such payments are deemed to be in furtherance of the housing authority's public purposes. The housing authority shall submit each such agreement to the city or county legislative body of all affected taxing jurisdictions for approval.

Before October 1 of each year, a housing authority to which authority to negotiate payments in lieu of taxes has been delegated by a city or county shall submit to the state board of equalization an annual report containing a list of all the real and personal property owned by the housing authority and its associated entities and subsidiaries with respect to which payments in lieu of ad valorem taxes have been negotiated and accepted; the value of each listed property, as estimated by the lessee of the property; the date and term of the lease for each listed property; the amount of payments made in lieu of property taxes for each listed property; the date each listed property is scheduled to return to the regular tax rolls; and a calculation of the taxes which would have been due for each listed property if the properties were privately owned or otherwise subject to taxation. Each lessee of the housing authority shall be responsible for the timely completion and filing of the report, and failure to timely complete and file the report shall subject such lessees to a penalty equivalent to that applicable to similar lessees of industrial development corporations; provided, that no lessee shall be liable who has provided the state board of equalization information required by this section as may be pertinent to property leased by the lessee from the housing authority.

If any two (2) authorities determine it to be in the best interest of each authority to merge, each such authority shall approve the merger by resolution. Any such resolution shall include the name of each authority involved in the merger, identify the surviving authority into which each authority plans to merge and the terms and conditions of the merger. Any such resolution shall be filed with each city or county that created each authority that is subject to the merger, and if the governing body of each such city or county approves such merger by resolution, the authorities may proceed with the merger. Upon the effective date of the merger:

Every other authority that is a party to the merger shall merge into the surviving authority and the separate existence of every authority except the surviving authority shall cease;

The title to all real estate and other property owned by each authority that is a party to the merger shall be vested in the surviving authority without reversion or impairment;

The surviving authority shall be deemed to have assumed all liabilities and obligations of each authority that is a party to the merger;

A proceeding pending against any corporation that is a party to the merger may be continued as if the merger did not occur or the surviving corporation may be substituted in the proceeding for the authority whose existence ceased; and

The board of commissioners of the surviving entity shall remain unchanged.

Upon the effective date of any such merger, the boundaries of the authority shall be deemed to be the collective boundaries of the merged authorities.

The surviving authority for purposes of this chapter shall continue to be considered a city, county or regional authority as was the case prior to the merger, and the appointment and composition of the board of commissioners of the surviving authority shall not change.

The power to merge authorities under this subsection (g) is supplemental to all other powers granted under this chapter to consolidate authorities or to create regional authorities.

A notice of any merger of authorities pursuant to this subsection (g) shall be filed with the secretary of state.

If an authority determines it to be in its best interest to dissolve, the authority shall approve such dissolution by resolution. Such resolution shall include a statement providing for the distribution of assets upon the completion of dissolution of the authority. Upon adoption of such resolution, subject to any approval required by the charter or bylaws of the authority and upon the approval by resolution by the governing body of each municipality or county that created such authority, articles of dissolution and termination setting forth the name of the authority, the date of its incorporation and a statement that the authority has approved the dissolution of the authority and the date on which such approval was given shall be delivered to the secretary of state. Upon filing the articles of dissolution with the secretary of state, the corporate existence of the authority shall terminate except for the purpose of conducting activities to wind up and liquidate its affairs, including collecting its assets, conveying and disposing of its properties that will not be distributed in kind, discharging or making provisions for discharging its liabilities, and returning, transferring or conveying assets held by the authority upon a condition requiring return, transfer or conveyance, which condition occurs by reason of the dissolution, in accordance with such condition, transferring, subject to any contractual or legal requirements, its assets as provided or authorized by its charter or bylaws.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 9; 1937, ch. 234, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.8 (Williams, § 3647.9); Acts 1972, ch. 690, § 2; 1976, ch. 729, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-804; Acts 1995, ch. 442, § 1; 1999, ch. 243, § 1; 2002, ch. 815, § 2; 2006, ch. 999, §§ 1-4; 2012, ch. 706, §§ 1-3; 2015, ch. 222, § 1.

Cross-References. Contracts with federal government authorized, § 13-20-610.

Law Reviews.

Real Property — 1955 Tennessee Survey (Wade H. Sides, Jr.), 8 Vand. L. Rev. 1110.

Tort Law–Negligence–Landlords' Duty Of Care To Tenants in Tennessee (Yusuf Malik), 77 Tenn. L. Rev. 471 (2010).

Attorney General Opinions. A housing authority may designate a non-profit corporation as its corporate agent, OAG 01-135, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 142 (8/31/01).

13-20-105. Private property — Taking by eminent domain restricted under certain conditions.

A housing authority created under this chapter shall not have the power to take by eminent domain private property in an urban renewal area for the purpose of resale, if the owner of same desires to develop such owner's own property and if the designated reuse of the property in the urban renewal plan is such that the owner's parcel can be redeveloped by itself without affecting the objectives of the urban renewal plan as to the owner's parcel or adjoining or adjacent properties thereto, and the owner signs an agreement with the housing authority to abide by the urban renewal plan, in any development thereof.

Acts 1972, ch. 711, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-833.

Law Reviews.

Tort Law–Negligence–Landlords' Duty Of Care To Tenants in Tennessee (Yusuf Malik), 77 Tenn. L. Rev. 471 (2010).

13-20-106. Housing research and studies.

In addition to all its other powers, any authority may, within its area of operation, undertake and carry out studies and analyses of the housing needs, and of the meeting of such needs, including data with respect to population and family groups and the distribution thereof according to income groups, the amount and quality of available housing and its distribution according to rentals and sales prices, employment, wages and other factors affecting the local housing needs and the meeting thereof, and make the results of such studies and analyses available to the public and the building, housing and supply industries, and may also engage in research and disseminate information on the subject of housing.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 49, as added by Acts 1945, ch. 102, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29M (Williams, § 3647.29y); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-805.

Law Reviews.

Tort Law–Negligence–Landlords' Duty Of Care To Tenants in Tennessee (Yusuf Malik), 77 Tenn. L. Rev. 471 (2010).

13-20-107. Cooperation of authorities in exercise of powers.

Any two (2) or more authorities may join or cooperate with one another in the exercise, either jointly or otherwise, of any or all of their powers for the purpose of financing, including the issuance of bonds, notes or other obligations and giving security therefor, planning, undertaking, owning, construction, operating or contracting with respect to a housing project or projects located within the boundaries of any one (1) or more of the authorities. For such purposes, an authority may by resolution prescribe and authorize any other housing authority or authorities, so joining or cooperating with it, to act on its behalf with respect to any or all of such powers. Any authorities joining or cooperating with one another may by resolution appoint from among the commissioners of such authorities an executive committee with full power to act on behalf of such authorities with respect to any or all of their powers, as prescribed by resolutions of such authorities.

Acts 1935, (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 10; 1943, ch. 22, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.9 (Williams, § 3647.10); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-806.

Law Reviews.

Tort Law–Negligence–Landlords' Duty Of Care To Tenants in Tennessee (Yusuf Malik), 77 Tenn. L. Rev. 471 (2010).

13-20-108. Eminent domain used to acquire land for housing projects and by United States agencies.

A housing authority as defined in § 13-20-102 and any corporation, which is an agency of the United States, shall, upon the adoption of a resolution declaring that the acquisition of the property described therein is in the public interest and necessary for public use, have the right to acquire by eminent domain any real property, including improvements and fixtures thereon, which it may deem necessary for a housing project being constructed, operated or aided by it or the United States. Any corporation borrowing money or receiving other financial assistance from the United States or any agency thereof for the purpose of financing the construction or operation of any housing project or projects, the operation of which will be subject to public supervision or regulation, shall have the right to acquire by eminent domain any real property, including fixtures and improvements thereon which it may deem necessary for such project. A housing project shall be deemed to be subject to public supervision or regulation within the meaning of this chapter if the rents to be charged are in any way subject to the supervision, regulation or approval of the United States, the state or any of their subdivisions or agencies, or by a housing authority, city, municipality or county, whether such right to supervise, regulate or approve is by virtue of any law, statute, contract or otherwise.

The power of eminent domain hereinabove conferred may be exercised pursuant to either:

Title 29, chapter 16; title 29, chapter 17, part 5; and any amendments thereto; or

Pursuant to any other applicable statutory provisions, now in force or hereafter enacted, for the exercise of the power of eminent domain.

Property already devoted to a public use may be acquired; provided, that no property belonging to any city or municipality or to any government may be acquired without its consent and that no property belonging to a public utility corporation may be acquired without the approval of the commission or other officer or tribunal, if any there be, having regulatory power over such corporation.

Whenever the power of eminent domain as herein conferred shall be exercised, in estimating the damages, the jury or jury of view, as the case may be, shall give the value of the land or rights taken without deduction, together with incidental damages, if any. Where the removal of furniture, household belongings, fixtures, merchandise, stock in trade, inventories, equipment or machinery is made necessary by the taking, the reasonable expense of such removal shall be considered in assessing incidental damages. The reasonable expense of the removal of such chattels shall be construed as including the cost of any necessary disconnection, dismantling or disassembling, the loading, and drayage to another location not more than ten (10) miles distant, and the reassembling, reconnecting, and installing in such new location. This provision shall only apply when the power of eminent domain is exercised under this section.

Acts 1935 (Ex.Sess.), ch. 20, § 11; 1935 (Ex.Sess.), ch. 44, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.10 (Williams, §§ 3647.11, 3647.39); Acts 1965, ch. 191, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-807; Acts 2014, ch. 927, § 9.

Law Reviews.

The Private Use of Public Power: The Private University and the Power of Eminent Domain; Part Two, Private University Expansion Through Eminent Domain — Section 112 of the Federal Urban Renewal Program, 27 Vand. L. Rev. 681, 705.

Tort Law–Negligence–Landlords' Duty Of Care To Tenants in Tennessee (Yusuf Malik), 77 Tenn. L. Rev. 471 (2010).

13-20-109. Acquisition of land for government.

The authority may acquire by purchase or by the exercise of its power of eminent domain as provided in § 13-20-108, any property real or personal for any housing project being constructed or operated by a government. The authority upon such terms and conditions, with or without consideration, as it shall determine, may convey title or deliver possession of such property so acquired or purchased to such government for use in connection with such housing project.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 12; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.11 (Williams, § 3647.12); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-808.

Law Reviews.

The Private Use of Public Power: The Private University and the Power of Eminent Domain; Part Three, Private University Expansion Through Section 112 — A Case Study, IV (formal planning), 27 Vand. L. Rev. 681, 733.

Tort Law–Negligence–Landlords' Duty Of Care To Tenants in Tennessee (Yusuf Malik), 77 Tenn. L. Rev. 471 (2010).

13-20-110. Conveyance, lease or agreement in aid of housing project.

For the purpose of aiding and cooperating in the planning, construction and operation of housing projects located within their respective territorial boundaries, the state, its subdivisions and agencies, and any county, city, or municipality of the state may, upon such terms and for such consideration as it may determine:

Grant, sell, convey or lease any of its property to a housing authority or the United States or any agency thereof;

To the extent that it is within the scope of each of their respective functions:

Cause the services customarily provided by each of them to be rendered for the benefit of the housing authority and/or the occupants of such housing projects;

Provide and maintain parks and sewage, water and other facilities adjacent to or in connection with housing projects; and

Enter into any agreements to open, close, pave, install, or change the grade of streets, roads, roadways, alleys, sidewalks, or other such facilities, to change the city or municipality map, to plan, replan, zone or rezone any part of the city or municipality;

Enter into agreements with respect to the exercise of its powers relating to the repair, elimination or closing of unsafe, unsanitary or unfit dwellings; and

Do any and all things necessary to aid and cooperate in the planning, construction and operation of housing projects by the United States and by housing authorities.

In connection with the exercise of these powers, any city or municipality may incur the entire expense of any such public improvement located within its territorial boundaries without assessment against abutting property owners.

Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any grant, sale, conveyance, lease or agreement provided for in this section may be made without appraisal, public notice, advertisement or public bidding.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 45, § 3; 1939, ch. 154, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29V (Williams, § 3647.32); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-809.

Law Reviews.

Tort Law–Negligence–Landlords' Duty Of Care To Tenants in Tennessee (Yusuf Malik), 77 Tenn. L. Rev. 471 (2010).

13-20-111. Federal projects acquired by authority.

With respect to any housing project which a housing authority has acquired or taken over from the federal government and which the housing authority by resolution has found and declared to have been constructed in a manner that will promote the public interest and afford necessary safety, sanitation and other protection, no municipality shall require any changes to be made in the housing project or the manner of its construction or take any other action relating to such construction.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 45, § 10, as added by Acts 1937, ch. 225, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29Z (Williams, § 3647.36c); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-810.

Cross-References. Contracts with federal government authorized, § 13-20-610.

Law Reviews.

Tort Law–Negligence–Landlords' Duty Of Care To Tenants in Tennessee (Yusuf Malik), 77 Tenn. L. Rev. 471 (2010).

13-20-112. Zoning and building laws.

All housing projects of an authority shall be subject to the planning, zoning, sanitary and building laws, ordinances and regulations applicable to the locality in which the housing project is situated.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.12 (Williams, § 3647.13); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-811.

Law Reviews.

Tort Law–Negligence–Landlords' Duty Of Care To Tenants in Tennessee (Yusuf Malik), 77 Tenn. L. Rev. 471 (2010).